New York, session 2025-2026, A1332.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new article 38-A 2 to read as follows: 3 ARTICLE 38-A 4 OFFICE OF ALGORITHMIC INNOVATION 5 Section 860. Office of algorithmic innovation. 6 § 860. Office of algorithmic innovation. 1. There is hereby created a 7 state office of algorithmic innovation. The office shall be headed by a 8 director who shall be appointed by the governor. The office shall have 9 as its primary purpose the creation of policies and standards to ensure 10 algorithms are safe, effective, fair, and ethical, and that the state is 11 conducive to promoting algorithmic innovation. The office shall have the 12 power to set standards for algorithms used in any technology, be able to 13 audit all algorithms, and set statewide policy on the use of algorithms 14 and promotion of innovation. The director shall appoint staff and 15 perform such other functions to ensure the efficient operation of the 16 office within the amounts made available therefor by appropriation. 17 2. For the purpose of this article, "algorithm" shall mean any set of 18 computer programming instructions used to complete an objective, includ- 19 ing for the purpose of creating technology that performs its own deci- 20 sion making otherwise known as artificial intelligence. 21 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 22 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04095-01-5